District of Columbia statutes.
3-1334

Gambling by minor prohibited.

No person shall knowingly permit any person under the age of 18 to participate in a game of bingo or to wager in any gambling activity authorized under this chapter. No person shall knowingly permit a person under the age of 18 years, unless accompanied by an adult, to be present in any room, office, building, or establishment where bingo, raffles, or Monte Carlo night parties is being played. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $300 or imprisonment not to exceed 30 days or both.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(b)(6), 34 DCR 900
1981 Ed., § 2-2534.